District of Columbia statutes.
29-408.20

Amendment by board of directors or members.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, the members of a membership corporation may amend or repeal the corporation’s bylaws.

(b)

The board of directors of a membership corporation or nonmembership corporation may amend or repeal the corporation’s bylaws, unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws or § 29-408.21 or § 29-408.22 reserve that power exclusively to the members or a designated body in whole or part.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720